src/import/nouns.lexc
kursusekaaslane+N:k´ursuse#k´aaslane SUULINE ;
kursusetöö+N:k´ursuse#t´öö%>%{id%} PUU ;
kursuslane+N:k´ursuslane OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kurt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´urt TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kurtisaan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k`urtis´aan TAUD ;
kurtmine+N:k´urtmine OLULINE ;
kurttumm+N:k´urt#t´umm%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kurtumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´urtumus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kurtus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´urtus SUULINE ;
kuru+N:kuru KAVA ;
kurultai+N:kurult´ai ARMEE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kurv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´urv TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kurvameelsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kurva#m´eelsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kurvastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kurvastus OLULINE ;
kurvits+N:kurvits MAGUS ;
kusejuha+N:kuse#juha KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kusemürgistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuse#mürgistus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kusemürgitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuse#mürgitus OLULINE ;
kusepidamatus+N:kuse#pidamatus SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kusetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kusetus OLULINE ;
@R.Part.One@kusi+N:@R.Part.One@kus,%{stemill%}%{rare%} MERI ;
kusija+N:kusija AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kusik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kusik VIRSIK ;
kusilane+N:kusilane OLULINE ;
kusiti+N:kusiti AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kusiveresus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kus,i#veresus OLULINE ;
kuslapuu+N:kusla#p´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kussutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kus,sutus OLULINE ;
kustukumm+N:kustu#k´umm TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kustumatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ustumatus SUULINE ;
kustumine+N:k´ustumine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kustumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ustumus OLULINE ;
kustutaja+N:kustutaja AASTA ;
kustutamine+N:kustutamine OLULINE ;
kustuti+N:kustuti AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kustutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kustutus OLULINE ;
kustutuskumm+N:kustutus#k´umm TAUD ;
kustutusvahend+N:kustutus#vahend REDEL ;
kutiikula+N:kut´iikula AASTA ;
kuts+N:k´ut,s TAUD ;
kutsa+N:kut,sa PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´utsar REDEL ;
kutsealune+N:k´utse#alune SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kutseharidus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´utse#haridus OLULINE ;
kutsekaart+N:k´utse#k´aart TAUD ;
kutsekaaslane+N:k´utse#k´aaslane SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsekaaslus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´utse#k´aaslus SUULINE ;
kutsekiri+N:k´utse#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
kutsekool+N:k´utse#k´ool, TAUD ;
kutseleht+N:k´utse#l´ehT1%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kutseoskus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´utse#´oskus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsetunnistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´utse#tun,nistus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kutseõppeasutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´utse#´õppe#asutus OLULINE ;
kutsikas+N:kut,sika LOHAKAS ;
kutsu+N:kut,su PERE ;
kutsumine+N:k´utsumine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´utsumus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsung+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kutsung REDEL ;
kutsutu+N:kutsutu AASTA ;
kutt+N:k´ut,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kutter+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uttE2r REDEL ;
kuu+N:k´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
kuub+N:k´uuB1%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT ;
kuubalane+N:kuubalane OLULINE ;
kuubalanna+N:kuubalanna PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuubik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuubik VIRSIK ;
kuuehõlm+N:kuue#h´õlm%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
kuuekäis+N:kuue#k´äis SOOLANE ;
kuuendik+N:k`uuend´ik ELANIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuguar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuuguar TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuuik VIRSIK ;
kuuketas+N:k´uu#k´etT1a KOTKAS ;
kuukiri+N:k´uu#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuul+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uul, TAUD ;
kuulaja+N:k´uulaja AASTA ;
kuulajaskond+N:k´uulajask´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
kuulamine+N:k´uulamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuular+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uular REDEL ;
kuulataja+N:kuulataja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulatlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuulatlus OLULINE ;
kuulatlustoru+N:kuulatlus#toru%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
kuuld+N:k´uulD1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuldamatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uuldamatus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuldavus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uuldavus OLULINE ;
kuuldeklapp+N:k´uulde#kl´app TAUD ;
kuuldu+N:k´uuldu AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuldus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uuldus SUULINE ;
kuule+N:k´uulD1e PINGE ;
kuule+N:k´uulE2 HAARE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulekus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuulekus OLULINE ;
kuuletumine+N:kuuletumine OLULINE ;
kuulike+N:kuul,ike PEENIKE ;
kuulipilduja+N:kuul,i#p´ilduja AASTA ;
kuulipildur+N:kuul,i#p´ildur REDEL ;
kuuliprits+N:kuul,i#pr´it,s TAUD ;
kuulirahe+N:kuul,i#rahe PERE ;
kuulitõuge+N:kuul,i#t´õuK2e PINGE ;
kuulja+N:k´uulja AASTA ;
kuullaager+N:k´uul,#l´aagE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulmatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uulmatus SUULINE ;
kuulmine+N:k´uulmine SUULINE ;
kuulmismulje+N:k´uulmis#m´ul,je PINGE ;
kuulnu+N:k´uulnu AASTA ;
kuulo+N:kuulo PERE ;
kuulsulepea+N:k´uul,#sule#p´E6A6%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uulsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulsusetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uulsusetus SUULINE ;
kuulujutt+N:kuulu#j´utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
kuulumine+N:k´uulumine OLULINE ;
kuulutaja+N:kuulutaja AASTA ;
kuulutamine+N:kuulutamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuulutus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuluvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uuluvus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuum+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uum%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
kuumamine+N:k´uumamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuumarabandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuuma#rabandus OLULINE ;
kuumaveeallikas+N:kuuma#v´ee#al,lika LOHAKAS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuumendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuumendus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uumus SUULINE ;
kuumutamine+N:kuumutamine OLULINE ;
kuumuti+N:kuumuti AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuumutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuumutus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuunar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uunar REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuup+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uup TAUD ;
kuupaiste+N:k´uu#p´aiste PINGE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuupaistetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uu#p´aistetus OLULINE ;
kuupalk+N:k´uu#p´alk%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
kuupmeeter+N:k´uup#m´eetE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuupuhastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uu#puhastus OLULINE ;
kuupäev+N:k´uu#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uur TAUD ;
kuure+N:k´uurE2 HAARE ;
kuuria+N:k´uuria AASTA ;
kuurits+N:kuurits MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuurort+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uur´ort TAUD ;
kuurortlinn+N:k´uur´ort#l´inn%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
kuursaal+N:k´uur#s´aal, TAUD ;
kuusaastak+N:k´uus#´aastak VIRSIK ;
kuusehekk+N:kuuse#h´ekk TAUD ;
kuuseke+N:kuuseke PEENIKE ;
kuusekorgik+N:kuuse#korgik VIRSIK ;
kuusemets+N:kuuse#m´ets%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
kuusenoorendik+N:kuuse#n`oorend´ik ELANIK ;
kuuseokas+N:kuuse#´okK1a KOTKAS ;
kuuseoks+N:kuuse#´oks%>%{pl.i%} KAEL ;
kuusepuu+N:kuuse#p´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
kuuseriisikas+N:kuuse#riisika LOHAKAS ;
kuuseseen+N:kuuse#s´een%{stemill%} KEEL ;
kuusetukk+N:kuuse#t´ukk%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
kuusevaras+N:kuuse#v´arG1a KOTKAS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuusik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuusik VIRSIK ;
kuusirp+N:k´uu#s´irp TAUD ;
kuusissetulek+N:k´uu#s´isse#tulek VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuusk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uusK1%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
kuuskant+N:k´uus#k´an,t TAUD ;
kuusmann+N:k´uus#m´an,n TAUD ;
kuusnurk+N:k´uus#n´urk%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuut+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uut, TAUD ;
kuutaja+N:k´uutaja AASTA ;
kuutõbi+N:k´uu#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuvalgus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uu#v´algus SUULINE ;
kuva+N:kuva KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuvand+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuvand REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuvar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuvar REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuväär+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuv´äär TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kušett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kuš´et,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvadraat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kvadr´aat TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvadrant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kvadr´an,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvadratuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kv`adrat´uur TAUD ;
kvadriljondik+N:kvadr`il,jond´ik ELANIK ;
kvadrofoonia+N:kvadrof´oonia AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvalifikatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kvalifikatsi´oon TAUD ;
kvalifikatsiooninõue+N:kvalifikatsi`ooni#n´õuD1e PINGE ;
kvaliteedinõue+N:kv`aliteedi#n´õuD1e PINGE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvaliteet+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kv`alit´eet TAUD ;
kvaliteetkorter+N:kv`alit´eet#k´orter REDEL ;
kvaliteetleht+N:kv`alit´eet#l´ehT1%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kv´an,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvantiil+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kvant´iil TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvantiteet+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kv`antit´eet TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvantor+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kv´antor REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvantum+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kv´antum REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvark+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kv´ark TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvart+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kv´art TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvartal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kv´artal REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvarter+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kv´arter REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvartett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kvart´et,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kvartiil+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kvart´iil TAUD ;
